Arkansas, session 2025, HB1918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-56-106 is amended to read as follows:
4-56-106. Specie or legal tender — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Bullion" means refined precious gold or silver metal
bullion or any shape or form as adopted by rule of the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State that is valued primarily based on its metal content and not on
its form or function;
(2) "Bullion depository" means an entity providing vault
facilities within the United States for the storage of bullion that:
(A) Is accredited by the London Bullion Market Association
for storage of bullion;
(B) Complies with the prescribed London Bullion Market
Association best practice guidelines for the storage of bullion; and
*ANS450*
04-02-2025 10:20:58 ANS450

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1918
(C) Has a contractual relationship to provide vault
services to hold and receive deposits of specie or legal tender for an
authorized precious metals-backed electronic payment system vendor;
(3) "Legal tender" means a recognized medium of exchange for the
payment of debts and taxes; and
(4) "Precious metals-backed electronic payment system" means an
electronic payment system that:
(A) Uses bullion held in a bullion depository as backing
for electronic transactions;
(B) Allows for the redemption of bullion by electronic
payment system participants;
(C) Enables the account holder to make payments to a
participating vendor; and
(D) Is an entity authorized and approved by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State to provide an account that holds bullion and
allows account holders to buy, sell, save, or spend bullion as a form of
currency;
(2)(5) "Specie" means:
(A) Coin having gold or silver content; or
(B) Refined gold or silver bullion Bullion that is:
(i) Coined coined, stamped, or imprinted with its
weight and purity; and
(ii) Valued primarily based on its metal content and
not its form;
(6) "State or local government" means:
(A) A county;
(B) A city of the first class, a city of the second class,
or an incorporated town; or
(C) Any other state entity or political subdivision of the
state or an agency, board, or commission of the state entity or political
subdivision of the state; and
(7)(A) "Transactional gold and silver" means a representation of
physical gold, silver, specie, or bullion that:
(i) May be transferred through electronic or written
instruction through a transaction by the owner of the specie; and
(ii) Is fully redeemable as physical gold, silver,
04-02-2025 10:20:58 ANS450

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1918
specie, or bullion.
(B) The representation of physical gold, silver, specie,
or bullion under subdivision (7)(A) of this section shall reflect the exact
units of physical gold, silver, specie, or bullion in its fractional troy
ounce measurement or grams.
(b) Specie or legal tender shall consist of:
(1) Specie coin issued by the United States Government; or
(2) Other specie that an Arkansas court rules to be within state
authority to make or designate as legal tender.
(c) Specie or legal tender shall not be characterized as personal
property for taxation or regulatory purposes.
(d)(1) The exchange of one (1) type or form of legal tender for
another type or form of legal tender shall not give rise to any tax
liability.
(2) The purchase, sale, or exchange of any type or form of
specie shall not give rise to any tax liability.
(e) Unless specifically provided by law or by contract, a person shall
not compel another person to tender specie or to accept specie as legal
tender.
(f) The Attorney General's office shall enforce this section without
prejudice to a private right of action.
(g) If a valid contract expressly designates a type or form of specie
as tender, then an Arkansas court asked to adjudicate the breach of such a
contract shall require, as a remedy for the breach, the specific performance
of tendering the type or form of specie specified in the contract.
(h) Specie may be recognized to pay debts Specie or legal tender may
be recognized to pay private debts, taxes, and fees levied by the state or
local government if the state or local government agrees to payment with
physical gold or silver.
(i)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall promulgate rules to
implement and administer this section.
(2) The rules promulgated under subdivision (i)(1) of this
section shall include without limitation:
(A)(i) The ability of a vendor to elect payment for goods
or services from a precious metals-backed electronic payment system
participant to be in either bullion or dollars at no additional cost to the
04-02-2025 10:20:58 ANS450

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1918
vendor.
(ii) The conversion of bullion into the dollar
equivalent shall be based on the terms agreed upon by the parties and provide
for the acceptance of specie, legal tender, or dollars as payment for any
public debt, tax, fee, or obligation owed at the option of the vendor;
(B) The security of the transactional gold and silver;
(C) That all account costs, conversion fees, or other cost
associated with the transactional gold and silver account remain with the
precious metals-backed electronic payment system participant, the provider of
the precious metals-backed electronic payment system, and the bullion
depository, as agreed to between them under a contract;
(D) Determining the sufficiency of the specie held by
bullion depositories authorized in the state of their physical location;
(E) Authorizing and approving precious metals-backed
electronic system vendors to do business within this state; and
(F) Fraud prevention.

/s/McAlindon


















04-02-2025 10:20:58 ANS450